District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-732

Trustees — Procedure for appointment to receive conveyances.

Repealed.

R.S., D.C., § 454
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 576, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 158(a)(2)
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(p), 58 DCR 1720

History

2001 Ed., § 29-732.
1981 Ed., § 29-914.
1973 Ed., § 29-514.

Prior Codifications